pl: Środki do pielęgnacji włosów w zestawie: Odżywka; Balsam do włosów; Krem do włosów; Żel do włosów; Maska do włosów; Olejek do włosów; Perfumy do włosów; Serum do włosów; Szampon; Zabieg prostowania; Inne
hu: A tartalmazott hajápolási cikkek: Kondicionáló; Hajbalzsam; Hajkrém; Hajzselé; Hajmaszk; Hajolaj; Hajparfüm; Hajszérum; Sampon; Egyenesítő kezelés; Egyéb
it: Articoli per la cura dei capelli inclusi: Balsamo per capelli; Balsamo capelli; Crema per capelli; Gel per capelli; Maschera per capelli; Olio per capelli; Profumo per capelli; Siero per capelli; Shampoo; Trattamento lisciante; Altro
pt-BR: Itens de cuidados com os cabelos incluídos: Condicionador; Bálsamo para cabelo; Creme de cabelo; Gel de cabelo; Máscara capilar; Óleo capilar; Perfume para cabelo; Sérum capilar; Shampoo; Tratamento de alisamento; Outro
pt-PT: Itens de cuidados com os cabelos incluídos: Condicionador de cabelo; Bálsamo para cabelo; Creme de cabelo; Gel de cabelo; Máscara capilar; Óleo para cabelo; Perfume de cabelo; Sérum capilar; Champô; Tratamento de alisamento; Outro
fr: Articles de soins capillaires inclus: Après-shampooing; Baume capillaire; Crème capillaire; Gel capillaire; Masque capillaire; Huile capillaire; Parfum capillaire; Sérum capillaire; Shampoing; Traitement de lissage; Autre
en: Hair care items included: Conditioner; Hair balm; Hair cream; Hair gel; Hair mask; Hair oil; Hair perfume; Hair serum; Shampoo; Straightening treatment; Other
hr-HR: Uključeni artikli za njegu kose: Regenerator; Balzam za kosu; Krema za kosu; Gel za kosu; Maska za kosu; Ulje za kosu; Parfem za kosu; Serum za kosu; Šampon; Tretman za jačanje; Ostalo
cs: Obsažené položky pro péči o vlasy: Kondicionér; Balzám na vlasy; Krém na vlasy; Gel na vlasy; Maska na vlasy; Olej na vlasy; Parfém na vlasy; Sérum na vlasy; Šampony; Rovnání; Jiné
el: Περιλαμβάνονται είδη περιποίησης μαλλιών: Μαλακτικό; Βάλσαμο μαλλιών; Κρέμα μαλλιών; Τζελ μαλλιών; Μάσκα μαλλιών; Λάδι μαλλιών; Άρωμα μαλλιών; Ορός μαλλιών; Σαμπουάν; Θεραπεία ισιώματος; Άλλο
sk-SK: Produkty starostlivosti o vlasy zahrnuté v cene: Kondicionér; Balzam na vlasy; Krém na vlasy; Gél na vlasy; Maska na vlasy; Olej na vlasy; Parfum na vlasy; Sérum na vlasy; Šampón; Vyrovnávanie; Iné
es: Artículos de cuidado del cabello incluidos: Acondicionador; Bálsamo para el cabello; Crema para el cabello; Gel para el cabello; Máscara para el cabello; Aceite para el cabello; Perfume para el cabello; Sérum capilar; Champú; Tratamiento de alisado; Otros
sv: Hårvårdsartiklar som ingår: Balsam; Hårbalsam; Hårkräm; Hårgelé; Hårmask; Hårolja; Hårparfym; Hårserum; Schampo; Uträtande behandling; Övrigt
nb: Hårpleieartikler medfølger: Conditioner; Hårbalsam; Hårkrem; Hårgele; Hårmaske; Hårolje; Hårparfyme; Hårserum; Sjampo; Rettebehandling; Annet
ro-RO: Articole pentru îngrijirea părului incluse: Balsam; Balsam de păr; Cremă de păr; Gel de păr; Mască de păr; Ulei de păr; Parfum de păr; Ser de păr; Șampon; Tratament de îndreptare; Altele
vi: Đi kèm sản phẩm chăm sóc tóc: Dầu xả; Dầu dưỡng tóc; Kem dưỡng tóc; Keo vuốt tóc; Mặt nạ ủ tóc; Tinh dầu dưỡng tóc; Nước hoa tóc; Tinh chất dưỡng tóc; Dầu gội; Duỗi tóc; Khác
ko: 헤어 케어 품목 포함: 컨디셔너; 헤어 밤; 헤어 크림; 헤어 젤; 헤어 마스크; 머리 기름; 헤어 향수; 헤어 세럼; 샴푸; 스트레이트닝 트리트멘트; 기타
zh-CN: 包含护发用品: 护发素; 护发膏; 发乳; 发胶; 发膜; 发油; 发香喷雾; 护发精华; 洗发水; 直发膏; 其他
th: รวมอุปกรณ์ดูแลผม: ครีมนวดผม; บาล์มสำหรับเส้นผม; ครีมบำรุงผม; เจลแต่งผม; ครีมหมักผม; ออยล์บำรุงเส้นผม; น้ำหอมฉีดผม; เซรัมบำรุงเส้นผม; แชมพู; ทรีทเม้นต์ยืดผม; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Priloženi izdelki za nego las: Balzam; Balzam za lase; Krema za lase; Gel za lase; Maska za lase; Olje za lase; Parfum za lase; Serum za lase; Šampon; Tretma za ravnanje; Drugo
bg-BG: Включени продукти за грижа за косата: Балсам; Балсам за коса; Крем за коса; Гел за коса; Маска за коса; Масло за коса; Парфюм за коса; Серум за коса; Шампоан; Третиране за изправяне; Други
ja: ヘアケア用品付き: コンディショナー; ヘアバーム; ヘアクリーム; ヘアジェル; ヘアマスク; ヘアオイル; ヘアパフューム; ヘアセラム; シャンプー; 縮毛矯正トリートメント; その他
fi: Mukana hiustenhoitotuotteet: Hoitoaine; Hiusbalsami; Hiusvoide; Hiusgeeli; Hiusnaamio; Hiusöljy; Hiushajuvesi; Hiusseerumi; Shampoo; Suoristushoito; Muu
de: Haarpflegeartikel inklusive: Spülung; Haarbalsam; Haarcreme; Haargel; Haarmaske; Haaröl; Haarparfüm; Haarserum; Shampoo; Glättungsbehandlung; Sonstiges
nl: Haarverzorgingsartikelen inbegrepen: Conditioner; Haarbalsem; Haarcrème; Haargel; Haarmasker; Haarolie; Haarparfum; Haarserum; Shampoo; Behandeling voor het rechttrekken; Andere
lt-LT: Komplekte esančios plaukų priežiūros priemonės: Kondicionierius; Plaukų balzamas; Plaukų kremas; Plaukų želė; Plaukų kaukė; Plaukų aliejus; Plaukų kvepalai; Plaukų serumas; Šampūnas; Tiesinamosios procedūros; Kita
ru: Состав набора для ухода за волосами: Кондиционер; Бальзам для волос; Крем для волос; Гель для волос; Маска для волос; Масло для волос; Духи для волос; Сыворотка для волос; Шампунь; Выпрямление; Другое
zh-TW: 包括護髮用品: 潤髮乳; 護髮膏; 護髮乳; 護髮凝膠; 護髮膜; 護髮油; 頭髮香水; 護髮精華素; 洗髮乳; 矯正護理; 其他
da: Hårplejeartikler medfølger: Conditioner; Hårbalsam; Hårcreme; Hårgel; Hårmaske; Hårolie; Hårparfume; Hårserum; Shampoo; Udglatningsbehandling; Andet
tr: Saç bakım ürünleri dahildir: Saç kremi; Saç balmı; Saç kremi; Saç jölesi; Saç maskesi; Saç yağı; Saç parfümü; Saç serumu; Şampuanlar; Düzleştirme tedavisi; Diğer